es: Tipo de ajuste de la antena: Látigo flexible; Antena oculta/interna; Aleta de tiburón (no compatible); Mástil corto/grueso; Mástil/látigo estándar; Universal; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta primjene antene: Fleksibilna bič-antena; Skrivena/unutarnja antena; Antena u obliku peraje (nije kompatibilno); Kratki/zdepasti stup; Standardni stup / bič-antena; Univerzalno; Ostalo
hu: Antennacsatlakozó típusa: Hajlékony pálca; Rejtett/belső antenna; Cápauszony (nem kompatibilis); Rövid/zömök rúd; Standard rúd/pálca; Univerzális; Egyéb
ro-RO: Tip de potrivire a antenei: Tijă flexibilă; Antenă ascunsă/internă; Înotătoare de rechin (incompatibilă); Tijă scurtă/groasă; Tijă/antenă standard; Universal; Altele
pl: Typ mocowania anteny: Elastyczny bat; Ukryta/wewnętrzna antena; Płetwa rekina (niekompatybilne); Krótki maszt; Standardowy maszt/bat; Uniwersalne; Inne
ja: アンテナフィットタイプ: フレキシブルホイップ; 隠し/内蔵アンテナ; シャークフィン (非互換); ショート/スタビーマスト; 標準マスト/ホイップ; ユニバーサル; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de ajuste de antena: Haste flexível; Antena oculta/interna; Barbatana de tubarão (incompatível); Mastro curto; Mastro/haste padrão; Universal; Outro
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งเสาอากาศ: เสาแบบวิปยืดหยุ่นได้; เสาอากาศซ่อน/ด้านใน; ครีบฉลาม (ไม่รองรับ); เสาแบบสั้น/ทรงป้อม; เสา/วิปมาตรฐาน; ครอบจักรวาล; อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di adattamento antenna: Frusta flessibile; Antenna nascosta/interna; Pinna di squalo (non compatibile); Antenna corta/tozza; Antenna standard/a frusta; Universale; Altro
nb: Type antennepassform: Fleksibel piskantenne; Skjult / innvendig antenne; Haifinne (ikke kompatibel); Kort/tykk mast; Standard mast/pisk; Universell; Annet
vi: Kiểu lắp đặt ăng-ten: Ăng-ten roi linh hoạt; Ăng-ten ẩn/bên trong; Vây cá mập (không tương thích); Cột ăng-ten ngắn/mập; Cột ăng-ten/ăng-ten roi tiêu chuẩn; Phổ quát; Khác
fr: Type de montage de l’antenne: Fouet flexible; Antenne cachée/intérieure; Aileron de requin (non compatible); Mât court/trapu; Mât/fouet standard; Universelle; Autre
el: Τύπος βάσης κεραίας: Εύκαμπτη κεραία (whip); Κρυφή/εσωτερική κεραία; Πτερύγιο καρχαρία (μη συμβατό); Κοντός ιστός; Τυπικός ιστός/κεραία whip; Γενικής χρήσης; Άλλο
lt-LT: Antenos montavimo tipas: Lanksti vytelinė; Paslėpta / vidinė antena; Ryklio peleko (nesuderinama); Trumpas / masyvus stiebas; Standartinis stiebas / vytelė; Universali; Kita
zh-CN: 天线适配类型: 柔性鞭状天线; 隐藏式/内置天线; 鲨鱼鳍天线（不兼容）; 粗短杆状天线; 标准杆状/鞭状天线; 通用; 其他
cs: Typ montáže antény: Ohebný prut; Skrytá/vnitřní anténa; Žraločí ploutev (nekompatibilní); Krátký prut; Standardní prut; Univerzální; Jiné
da: Antennemonteringstype: Fleksibel piskeantenne; Skjult/indvendig antenne; Hajfinne (ikke kompatibel); Kort/kompakt mast; Standardmast/-piskeantenne; Universal; Andet
tr: Anten montaj türü: Esnek çubuk; Gizli/iç anten; Köpek balığı yüzgeci (uyumlu değil); Kısa/küt direk; Standart direk/çubuk; Evrensel; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ upevnenia antény: Flexibilný prút; Skrytá/vnútorná anténa; Žraločia plutva (nekompatibilné); Krátky/zavalitý stožiar; Štandardný stožiar/prút; Univerzálne; Iný
sl-SI: Vrsta prileganja antene: Prilagodljiva bičasta antena; Skrita/notranja antena; Plavut morskega psa (ni združljivo); Kratek/čokat drog; Standardni drog/bičasta antena; Univerzalno; Drugo
ru: Тип крепления антенны: Гибкая штыревая; Скрытая/внутренняя антенна; Акулий плавник (несовместимо); Короткая/укороченная антенна; Стандартный штырь/мачта; Универсальная; Другое
nl: Antennetype: Flexibele spriet; Verborgen/interne antenne; Haaienvin (niet compatibel); Korte/stompe mast; Standaardmast/-spriet; Universeel; Overig
zh-TW: 天線安裝類型: 彈性天線; 隱藏式/內置天線; 鯊魚鰭 (不相容); 短/粗短天線; 標準天線; 通用; 其他
ko: 안테나 장착 유형: 플렉서블 휩; 숨김형/내장형 안테나; 샤크 핀(호환 불가); 숏/스터비 마스트; 표준 마스트/휩; 범용; 기타
en: Antenna fit type: Flexible whip; Hidden/inside antenna; Shark-fin (not compatible); Short/stubby mast; Standard mast/whip; Universal; Other
fi: Antennin sopivuustyyppi: Joustava piiska-antenni; Piilotettu/sisäinen antenni; Hainevä (ei yhteensopiva); Lyhyt / tynkä antenni; Vakiomasto/-piiska; Yleismalli; Muu
de: Antennentyp: Flexible Peitsche; Versteckte/Innenantenne; Haifischflosse (nicht kompatibel); Kurzer/Stummelmast; Standardmast/-stab; Universal; Sonstige
bg-BG: Тип закрепване на антената: Гъвкава антена; Скрита/вътрешна антена; Акулова перка (несъвместима); Къса антена; Стандартна мачта/антена; Универсална; Друго
sv: Typ av antennpassform: Flexibelt spröt; Dold/invändig antenn; Hajfena (inte kompatibel); Kort/tjock mast; Standardmast/-spröt; Universell; Annan
pt-PT: Tipo de encaixe da antena: Haste flexível; Antena oculta/interior; Barbatana de tubarão (não compatível); Mastro curto; Mastro/haste padrão; Universal; Outro